District of Columbia statutes.
37-131.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Fund” means the Vending Regulation Fund established by § 37-131.07(b).

(2)

“Public market” means a vending operation that takes place in an area of public space set aside and permitted on a regular basis for the sale of goods, merchandise, or services provided onsite, which vending operation includes a farmers market, flea market, or antique market.

(3)

“Vending locations” means the specific locations designated by the Mayor on sidewalks, roadways, and other public space at which a person may vend.

(4)

“Vending site permit” means a permit or other authorization issued by the Mayor for a vending location.

History

Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-71, § 2, 56 DCR 6619

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-1212.01, § 10-1141.02, and § 48-102.

Temporary Amendment of Section

Section 2(a) of D.C. Law 19-144 added pars. (1A) and (2A) to read as follows:
“(1A) ‘Healthy food vendor’ means a vendor that sells only unprocessed, unfrozen, whole, raw fruits and vegetables that have not been combined with other ingredients; provided, that the Mayor, by rule, may expand this definition to include other healthy food items.”.
“(2A) ‘Underserved area’ means a historically underutilized business zone, as defined by section 3(p)(1) of the Small Business Act, approved July 18, 1958 (72 Stat. 384; 15 U.S.C. § 632(p)(1)).”.
Section 5(b) of D.C. Law 19-144 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 10(a) of Vending Regulation Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-322, March 19, 2008, 55 DCR 3445).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 10(a) of Vending Regulation Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-9, January 29, 2009, 56 DCR 1638).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 10(a) of Vending Regulation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-47, April 27, 2009, 56 DCR 3574).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Fresh Healthy Mobile Cart Vending Pilot in Underserved Areas Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-325, March 18, 2012, 59 DCR 2261).

Delegation of Authority

Transfer of Authority for Vending Regulation, see Mayor’s Order 2009-106, June 16, 2009, ( 56 DCR 6853).